Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.320

Design-build procedure—Project management and contracting requirements.

(1) A public body utilizing the design-build contracting procedure shall provide:

(a) Reasonable budget contingencies totaling not less than five percent of the anticipated contract value;

(b) Staff or consultants with expertise and prior experience in the management of comparable projects;

(c) Contract documents that include alternative dispute resolution procedures to be attempted prior to the initiation of litigation;

(d) Submission of project information, as required by the board;

(e) Contract documents that require the contractor, subcontractors, and designers to submit project information required by the board; and

(f) Contract documents that require the design builder to submit plans for inclusion of underutilized firms as subcontractors and suppliers including, but not limited to, the office of minority and women's business enterprises certified businesses, veteran certified businesses, and small businesses as allowed by law.

(2) A public body utilizing the design-build contracting procedure may provide incentive payments to contractors for early completion, cost savings, or other goals if such payments are identified in the request for proposals.

[ 2019 c 212 s 5; 2013 c 222 s 10; 2007 c 494 s 203; 1994 c 132 s 7. Formerly RCW 39.10.070.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.